Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 2. County Financial Support

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 21-13-201.
Levy, collection and distribution of 6 mill school tax.

Pursuant to article XV, section 17 of the constitution of the state of Wyoming, there shall be levied each year, by the county commissioners in each county in the state, a tax of six (6) mills on the dollar of assessed valuation of the property within the county for the support and maintenance of the public schools. This tax shall be collected by the county treasurer.

On or before September 1 of each year, the state department of education shall notify the treasurer of each county of the percentage proportion to be allocated from the countywide six (6) mill school levy to each school district in his respective county. The computation of the distribution of the countywide six (6) mill levy shall be made by the department of education on the basis of the average daily membership (ADM) for the previous year. This number, for each district, shall be converted into a percentage of the total average daily membership (ADM) for all school districts within the county. The county treasurer shall distribute the revenue arising from the countywide six (6) mill levy among the school districts of the county according to the percentage computed above and pursuant to W.S.

21-13-207

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 109, § 1; ch. 170, § 1; 1969, ch. 111, § 217; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-217; Laws 1977, ch. 45, § 2; 1983, ch. 136, § 2; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 501.

Right to education cannot constitutionally be conditioned on wealth. —

Although the quality of a child's education in the state, measured in terms of dollars available for that purpose, is dependent upon the property tax resources of his school district, the right to an education cannot constitutionally be conditioned on wealth in that such a measure does not afford equal protection. Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

Interest follows principal fund. —

Interest is an accretion or increment to the principal fund earning it and the interest follows the fund. As soon as funds are collected by the county treasurer, the funds belong to the school district and interest earned on those funds also belongs to the school district. Board of County Comm'rs v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 884 P.2d 946,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1994).

Stated

in

Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 907 P.2d 1238,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Equal Protection and the Financing of Public Education in Wyoming,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1973).

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references

Validity of public school funding systems, 110 ALR5th 293.

Procedural issues concerning public school funding cases, 115 ALR5th 563.

§§ 21-13-202 through 21-13-205.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 43, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1911, ch. 106, § 7, Laws 1913, ch. 52, § 1, and Laws 1923, ch. 49, §§ 1 through 3, related to school bus drivers, transportation routes, and financial support therefor.

§ 21-13-206.
Disposition of fines, penalties and forfeitures.

All fines, penalties, and forfeitures provided by the school laws may be recovered by an action by any citizen in the name of the people of the state of Wyoming for the use of the proper school district or county, and when they accrue, shall belong to the school district or county in which they have accrued and shall be deposited with the county treasurer.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 103, § 59; R.S. 1887, § 3976; R.S. 1899, § 619; C.S. 1910, § 1970; C.S. 1920, § 2276; R.S. 1931, § 99-347; C.S. 1945, § 67-642; W.S. 1957, § 21-149; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 222; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-222.

§ 21-13-207.
Apportionment of funds by county treasurer.

On the second Monday of each month, and on June 20 or the last business day immediately preceding June 20 of each year, the county treasurer shall apportion all monies in the county treasury belonging to the county school fund, including all interest earned thereon and including fines and forfeitures, among the various school districts of the county in the same percentages as provided by W.S. 21-13-201(b) and shall immediately pay the amount to each school district.

History.

Laws 1884, ch. 82, § 1; 1886, ch. 62, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 3914; Laws 1888, ch. 67, § 1; 1895, ch. 44, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1193; Laws 1909, ch. 154, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1299; Laws 1911, ch. 90, § 1; 1913, ch. 52, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 1554; Laws 1923, ch. 49, § 6; 1927, ch. 89, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 40-907; Laws 1933, ch. 10, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 27-1107; W.S. 1957, § 21-296; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 223; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-223; Laws 1981, ch. 43, § 1; 1983, ch. 136, § 2; 2021 ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "and on June 20 or the last business day immediately preceding June 20 of each year," preceding "the county treasurer."

Interest follows principal fund. —

Interest is an accretion or increment to the principal fund earning it and the interest follows the fund. As soon as funds are collected by the county treasurer, the funds belong to the school district and interest earned on those funds also belongs to the school district. Board of County Comm'rs v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 884 P.2d 946,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1994).

Quoted

in

Platte County Sch. Dist. No. 1 v. Basin Elec. Power Coop., 638 P.2d 1276,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

Campbell County Sch. Dist. No. 1 v. Board of County Comm'rs, 884 P.2d 960,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1994).